North Dakota, session 69, HB1102.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. APPROPRIATION - ATTORNEY GENERAL - BUREAU OF CRIMINAL
INVESTIGATION CYBERCRIME RESOURCES - FULL-TIME EQUIVALENT POSITIONS -
ONE-TIME FUNDING. There is appropriated out of any moneys in the general fund in the state
treasury, not otherwise appropriated, the sum of $775,000, or so much of the sum as may be
necessary, to the attorney general for the purpose of hiring two full-time equivalent bureau of
criminal investigation cybercrime agent positions and for related equipment and capital asset
costs, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2027. The personnel hired
and resources purchased pursuant to this section must be dedicated to assisting a police
department in a city in northeastern North Dakota with at least 50,000 residents with the
prevention and detection of cybercrime. Of the amount appropriated in this section, $161,000 is
considered a one-time funding item for the purchase of equipment.
Page No. 1 25.0611.01000